Massachusetts, session 194th, H3391.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
General Laws, Part I Title III Chapter 30B the Uniform Procurement Act Section 15(a) is
hereby amended by adding after section (g):-

“(h) Notwithstanding any other requirement of this section, a governmental body may,
unless otherwise prohibited by law, dispose of a tangible supply no longer useful to the
governmental body but having resale or salvage value, using written procedures approved by the
governmental body, provided the written procedures clearly identify the tangible supply and the
interest served by the manner of disposal described therein.”
of 1